District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.11

Rescission.

All organizational orders and parts thereof in conflict with any of the provisions of this chapter are rescinded, except that any regulations adopted or promulgated by virtue of the authority granted by such orders shall remain in force until revised, amended, or repealed.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 111, 54 DCR 818
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 111 of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).